test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_nieida_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# ok

Tests:

  Noun - nieidâ:
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Nom: nieiˊdâ
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Gen: nieidâ
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Acc: nieidâ
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Ill: nieidân
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Loc: nieidâst
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Com: nieiˊdáin
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Abe: nieˊidâttáá
    nieidâ+N+Ess: nieiˊdân
    nieidâ+N+Par: nieiˊdâd
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Nom: nieidah
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Gen: [nieidâi, nieˊidâi]
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Acc: nieidâid
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Ill: nieiˊdáid
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Loc: nieidâin
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Com: nieˊidâiguin
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Abe: nieˊidâittáá

  Noun - ruoidâ:
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Nom: ruoiˊdâ
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Gen: ruoidâ
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Acc: ruoidâ
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Ill: ruoidân
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Loc: ruoidâst
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Com: ruoiˊdáin
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Abe: ruoˊidâttáá
    ruoidâ+N+Ess: ruoiˊdân
    ruoidâ+N+Par: ruoiˊdâd
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Nom: ruoidah
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Gen: [ruoidâi, ruoˊidâi]
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Acc: ruoidâid
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Ill: ruoiˊdáid
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Loc: ruoidâin
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Com: ruoˊidâiguin
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Abe: ruoˊidâittáá

  Noun - mielgâ:
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Nom: mielˊgâ
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Gen: mielgâ
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Acc: mielgâ
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Ill: mielgân
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Loc: mielgâst
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Com: mielˊgáin
    mielgâ+N+Sg+Abe: mieˊlgâttáá
    mielgâ+N+Ess: mielˊgân
    mielgâ+N+Par: mielˊgâd
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Nom: mielgah
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Gen: [mielgâi, mieˊlgâi]
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Acc: mielgâid
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Ill: mielˊgáid
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Loc: mielgâin
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Com: mieˊlgâiguin
    mielgâ+N+Pl+Abe: mieˊlgâittáá

  Noun - kuorgâ:
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Nom: kuorˊgâ
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuorgâ
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Acc: kuorgâ
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuorgân
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuorgâst
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Com: kuorˊgáin
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Abe: kuoˊrgâttáá
    kuorgâ+N+Ess: kuorˊgân
    kuorgâ+N+Par: kuorˊgâd
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Nom: kuorgah
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kuorgâi, kuoˊrgâi]
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Acc: kuorgâid
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Ill: kuorˊgáid
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Loc: kuorgâin
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Com: kuoˊrgâiguin
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Abe: kuoˊrgâittáá

  Noun - vuovdâ:
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Nom: vuovˊdâ
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Gen: vuovdâ
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Acc: vuovdâ
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Ill: vuovdân
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Loc: vuovdâst
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Com: vuovˊdáin
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Abe: vuoˊvdâttáá
    vuovdâ+N+Ess: vuovˊdân
    vuovdâ+N+Par: vuovˊdâd
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Nom: vuovdah
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Gen: [vuovdâi, vuoˊvdâi]
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Acc: vuovdâid
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Ill: vuovˊdáid
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Loc: vuovdâin
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Com: vuoˊvdâiguin
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Abe: vuoˊvdâittáá

  Noun - čuoškâ:
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Nom: čuošˊkâ
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Gen: čuoškâ
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Acc: čuoškâ
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Ill: čuoškân
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Loc: čuoškâst
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Com: čuošˊkáin
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Abe: čuoˊškâttáá
    čuoškâ+N+Ess: čuošˊkân
    čuoškâ+N+Par: čuošˊkâd
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Nom: čuoškah
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Gen: [čuoškâi, čuoˊškâi]
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Acc: čuoškâid
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Ill: čuošˊkáid
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Loc: čuoškâin
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Com: čuoˊškâiguin
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Abe: čuoˊškâittáá

  Noun - lievlâ:
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Nom: lievˊlâ
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Gen: lievlâ
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Acc: lievlâ
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Ill: lievlân
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Loc: lievlâst
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Com: lievˊláin
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Abe: lieˊvlâttáá
    lievlâ+N+Ess: lievˊlân
    lievlâ+N+Par: lievˊlâd
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Nom: lievlah
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Gen: [lievlâi, lieˊvlâi]
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Acc: lievlâid
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Ill: lievˊláid
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Loc: lievlâin
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Com: lieˊvlâiguin
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Abe: lieˊvlâittáá
